Nebraska, session 109, LB603.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB603 LB603
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 81-2234, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2234 (1) Care management clients may contribute to the costs of
receiving care management services, as provided under section 81-2230. A
client family income schedule, using the federal poverty guidelines,
shall be used to determine a care management client's voluntary
contribution. Individuals who have family income below three hundred
percent of a poverty level determined by the Department of Health and
Human Services based on any federal poverty index or similar guidelines
may contribute shall pay from zero to ninety percent of the cost fee for
the services provided by a care management unit. The client family income
schedule fee scale shall be adopted and promulgated as rules and
regulations by the department and shall reflect the income range of
individuals.
(2) A care management unit may receive reimbursement from state and
federal government programs which allow for reimbursement for care
management or case management services.
(3) Individuals not covered by subsection (1) or (2) of this section
shall pay the full fee for services provided by a care management unit.
Sec. 2. Section 81-2235, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2235 (1) Each care management unit may be reimbursed by the
Department of Health and Human Services for costs not paid for by the
individual or through other reimbursement specified in section 81-2234.
Reimbursement by the department shall be based on actual casework time
units expended on all care management services provided and shall include
expenses for personnel, administration and planning, client eligibility
review, contractual services, and necessary support services and other
necessary actual and indirect costs. Standardized rates of reimbursement
shall be adopted and promulgated by the department and shall be adjusted
at least every three years.
-2-

LB603 LB603
2025 2025
(2) Appropriations for reimbursement by the department for services
provided under sections 81-2229 to 81-2235 and for the costs of the
department to administer the program shall be appropriated separately
from funds appropriated under the Nebraska Community Aging Services Act.
Sec. 3. Original sections 81-2234 and 81-2235, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-3-